Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3024.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5631XC (7) 91 th/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 321.183A Citizenship and 1 immigration status verification. 2 1. The department shall use the SAVE program, or any 3 successor federal verification system, to verify the United 4 States citizenship and immigration status of each person who 5 applies for issuance or renewal of a driverâs license or 6 nonoperatorâs identification card and who does not provide 7 proof that the person is a United States citizen. The 8 department shall not issue or renew a driverâs license or 9 nonoperatorâs identification card if the person does not 10 provide proof the person is a United States citizen and the 11 department is unable to verify the personâs status as lawfully 12 present in the United States. 13 2. For purposes of this section, âSAVE programâ means the 14 systematic alien verification for entitlements system of the 15 United States department of homeland security and the United 16 States citizenship and immigration services. 17